District of Columbia statutes.
25-712

Warning signs regarding dangers of alcohol consumption during pregnancy required.

(a)

A licensees shall post in a conspicuous place, in accordance with regulations, a sign which reads: “Warning: Drinking alcoholic beverages during pregnancy can cause birth defects.”.

(b)

If the Board determines that action in addition to that required by subsection (a) of this section is necessary to accomplish the objectives of this title, the Board may require additional warnings.

(c)

The Board shall prepare the signs and make them available at no charge to licensees.

(d)

Each day of noncompliance shall constitute a separate violation of this section.

(e)

A violation of this section shall be punishable as a secondary tier violation.

(f)

This section shall not apply to the holder of a wholesaler’s license that is not open to the public.

Jan. 24, 1934, ch. 4, § 47
as added Nov. 19, 1985, D.C. Law 6-57, § 2, 32 DCR 5722
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-201, § 5(c), 55 DCR 6289
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-270, § 2(e)(3), 62 DCR 1866
1981 Ed., § 25-712.
D.C. Law 17-201 added subsec. (f).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-270 rewrote (e).